Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.395

President's housing allowance.

Housing or a housing allowance may only be provided for the president of a public four-year institution of higher education who resides in the location where the institution is designated under RCW 28B.20.010, 28B.30.010, 28B.35.010, and 28B.40.010.

[ 1998 c 344 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Findings—1998 c 344: See note following RCW 28B.10.029.